Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.260

Supervisor of industrial relations—Appointment—Authority—Personnel.

The director of labor and industries shall appoint and deputize an assistant, to be known as the supervisor of industrial relations, who shall have authority to perform those duties delegated by the director and by statute.

The director may appoint an assistant to be known as the industrial statistician, and an assistant to be known as the supervisor of employment standards and may appoint and employ experts, clerks, and other assistants as may be necessary to carry on the industrial relations work of the department.

[ 1994 c 164 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 31; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 16 s 11; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 82; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.260. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 77; RRS s 10835.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.